New York, session 2025-2026, S3884.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 21-324.1 to read as follows: 3 § 21-324.1 Community notification requirement. 1. When the department 4 intends to use a new location as transitional housing for eligible home- 5 less families and individuals, or expand an existing location where 6 transitional housing is provided, the commissioner shall provide notifi- 7 cation in writing to the community board for the community district in 8 which the transitional housing will be located. Such notice shall be 9 provided at least sixty days before the department enters into a 10 contractual arrangement with a transitional housing provider or other- 11 wise finalizes its decision to use or expand a location as transitional 12 housing. 13 2. The notification shall include the address of the transitional 14 housing, the number of people who will be housed, the name of the person 15 or entity operating the transitional housing, the name of any organiza- 16 tion, whether for-profit or not-for-profit, that will be providing 17 services to the occupants of the transitional housing, the type of tran- 18 sitional housing, a description of the services that will be provided, 19 the rationale for choosing such location, and an approximate schedule 20 for when such transitional housing will be used or expanded. 21 3. This section shall apply to any transitional housing facility oper- 22 ated or contracted for, by or on behalf of the department, regardless of 23 its size and capacity. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00545-01-5